Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1414
Law enforcement
officers; certificate or diploma; when required; issuance; waiver.

(1) On and after January 1, 1972, law enforcement officers
already serving under permanent appointment shall not be required to meet
any requirement of subsection (2) of this section as a condition of tenure
or continued employment.

(2) On and after January 1, 1972, no person shall receive
appointment as a law enforcement officer unless he or she has been awarded
a certificate or diploma by the commission attesting to satisfactory completion
of the minimum curriculum of the training center as established by the council
or has been awarded a certificate or diploma attesting to satisfactory completion
of a training program which the council finds equivalent thereto. Any person
who has not been awarded such a certificate or diploma may receive an appointment
conditioned on satisfactory completion of such training if he or she immediately
applies for admission to the training center or any training academy and enrolls
in the next available basic training class. If such training is not completed
within one year after the appointment, the person's employment shall not be
renewed by a political subdivision appointment or otherwise and such person
shall no longer be recognized as a law enforcement officer, except that in cases of extreme hardship,
upon application by the officer, the council may grant a waiver to allow the
officer to complete the basic training program as soon as is practicable after
the one-year time allowance. Any individual who is not certified in accordance
with this section and has worked as a law enforcement officer for multiple
law enforcement agencies or political subdivisions shall have his or her time
of employment aggregated in order to determine if he or she has worked for
more than one year. If that law enforcement officer's aggregate time of employment
exceeds one year, that officer shall not be recognized as a law enforcement
officer for any political subdivision until he or she has satisfactorily completed
such certification training. For purposes of this section, the council shall
deem the successful completion of the federal Bureau of Indian Affairs basic
police training program as administered by the Federal Law Enforcement Training
Center to constitute such equivalent training, and officers certified by virtue
of such equivalent training may exercise full law enforcement authority exclusively
on tribal lands.

(3) Law enforcement officers who are promoted in rank shall
satisfactorily complete such council-approved training within one year of
such promotion.

(4) At the direction of the council, the director shall issue
a certificate or diploma attesting to a compliance with the requirements of
subsection (2) or (3) of this section to any applicant who presents evidence
of satisfactory completion of a council-approved training program.

Laws 1969, c. 773, § 14, p. 2930;

Laws 1971, LB 929, § 7;

Laws 1994, LB 971, § 10;

Laws 1996, LB 1055, § 12;

Laws 1997, LB 161, § 1;

Laws 2000, LB 994, § 9;

Laws 2012, LB817, § 10.

Under the facts of this case, a certificate for satisfactory completion of a training program relative to this section is not a condition precedent to a police officer's execution of official duties as a law enforcement officer. State v. Harney, 237 Neb. 512, 466 N.W.2d 540 (1991).